02_Morphology/bod.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>					! Noun
%<pl%>					! Plurality
%<gen%>					! Genitive
%<erg%>					! Ergative
%<abl%>					! Ablative
%<obl%>					! Oblique
%<ass%>					! Associative

%{g%}
%{y%}
%{i%}
%{T%}
%{u%}

LEXICON Root

Nouns ;

LEXICON N-I

%<n%>: CASE ;

LEXICON N-II

%<n%>: PLURALITY ;

LEXICON PLURALITY

%<sg%>: CASE ;
%<pl%>:%>tso CASE ;

LEXICON CASE

%<abs%>: # ;					! Absolutive
%<gen%>:%>%{g%}%{y%}i # ;		! Genitive
%<erg%>:%>%{g%}%{y%}{i%}s # ;	! Ergative
%<abl%>:%>nas #;				! Ablative
%<obl%>:%>%{T%}%{u%} #;			! Oblique
%<ass%>:%>dang #;				! Associative

LEXICON Nouns

bod:bod N-I ;				! "Tibet"			1
bodpa:bodpa N-II ;			! "Tibetan"			2
tshakspar:tshakspar N-I ;	! "Newspaper"		3
ama:ama N-II ;				! "Mother"			4
rmomo:rmomo N-II ;			! "Grandmother"		5
ace:ace N-II ;				! "Elder Sister"	6
slopma:slopma N-II ;		! "Student"			7
parchas:parchas N-I ;		! "Camera"			8
rimo:rimo N-I ;				! "Drawing"			9
spuku:spuku N-II ;			! "Child"			10
rta:rta N-I ;				! "Horse"			11
byargod:byargod N-I ;		! "Vulture"			12
ri:ri N-I ;					! "Mountain"		13
phayul:phayul N-I ;			! "Country"			14
smyuku:smyuku N-I ;			! "Bamboo"			15
thep:thep N-I ;				! "Book"			16
mi:mi N-II ;				! "Person"			17
hdzamkling:hdzamkling N-I ;	! "World"			18
sloptshan:sloptshan N-I ;	! "Lesson"			19
groksmo:groksmo N-II ;		! "Friend, Fem."	20
